Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202579-3803
Terms, defined.

For purposes of the Stand With Women Act:

(1) Athletic association means a corporation, association, or organization which has as one of its primary purposes the sponsoring or administration of extracurricular interscholastic athletic contests or competitions;

(2) Boy means an adolescent human male;

(3) Female means an individual who naturally has, had, will have, or would have, but for a congenital anomaly or intentional or unintentional disruption, the reproductive system that at some point produces, transports, and utilizes eggs for fertilization. Female includes a woman and a girl;

(4) Girl means an adolescent human female;

(5) Male means an individual who naturally has, had, will have, or would have, but for a congenital anomaly or intentional or unintentional disruption, the reproductive system that at some point produces, transports, and utilizes sperm for fertilization. Male includes a man and a boy;

(6) Man means an adult human male;

(7) Postsecondary educational institution means a university, college, or community college located in Nebraska that is a member institution of an accrediting body recognized by the United States Department of Education;

(8) Private school means any private, denominational, or parochial school offering instruction in elementary or high school grades;

(9) Public school means any public school offering instruction in elementary or high school grades;

(10) Sex means an individual's sex, either male or female; and

(11) Woman means an adult human female.

Laws 2025, LB89, § 3.